Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-283
Town lots; equitable owners; failure to demand deed within three years; effect.

All persons who shall be or may become the owners of any equities of title in and to any town lot or lots or land within any incorporated town or city in this state, by virtue of which they shall be entitled to demand and receive from the corporate authorities a title in fee simple to the same, shall present their claims and make demand for the deed within three years after such entry by the town or city as a townsite; Provided, if any person shall neglect to comply with the terms of this section as aforesaid, the title in and to such realty shall vest in the corporation as fully, and to all intents and purposes, as though conveyed to such town or city by deed of general warranty.

Laws 1867, § 1, p. 94;

R.S.1913, § 6282;

C.S.1922, § 5801;

C.S.1929, § 76-802;

R.S.1943, § 76-283.